Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.10 Opioid Stewardship Act

21-28.10-1.
Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms shall be construed in this chapter to have the following meanings:

“Distribute” means distribute as defined in §

21-28-1.02

.

“Distributor” means distributor as defined in §

21-28-1.02

.

“Executive office” means the executive office of health and human services.

“Manufacture” means manufacture as defined in §

21-28-1.02

.

“Manufacturer” means manufacturer as defined in §

21-28-1.02

.

“Market share” means the total opioid stewardship fund amount measured as a percentage of each manufacturer’s, distributor’s and wholesaler’s gross, in-state opioid sales in dollars from the previous calendar year as reported to the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) on its Automation of Reports and Consolidated Orders System (ARCOS) report.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the executive office of health and human services.

“Wholesaler” means wholesaler as defined in §

21-28-1.02

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

21-28.10-2.
Opioid registration fee imposed on manufacturers, distributors, and wholesalers.

All manufacturers, distributors, and wholesalers licensed or registered under this title or chapter 19.1 of title 5 (hereinafter referred to as “licensees”), that manufacture or distribute opioids shall be required to pay an opioid registration fee. On an annual basis, the secretary shall certify the amount of all revenues collected from opioid registration fees and any penalties imposed, to the general treasurer. The amount of revenues so certified shall be deposited annually into the opioid stewardship fund restricted receipt account established pursuant to §

21-28.10-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

21-28.10-3.
Determination of market share and registration fee.

The total opioid stewardship fund amount shall be five million dollars ($5,000,000) annually, subject to downward adjustments pursuant to §

21-28.10-7

.

Each manufacturer’s, distributor’s, and wholesaler’s annual opioid registration fee shall be based on that licensee’s in-state market share.

The following sales will not be included when determining a manufacturer’s, distributor’s, or wholesaler’s market share:

The gross, in-state opioid sales attributed to the sale of buprenorphine or methadone;

The gross, in-state opioid sales sold or distributed directly to opioid treatment programs, data-waivered practitioners, or hospice providers licensed pursuant to chapter 17 of title 23;

Any sales from those opioids manufactured in Rhode Island, but whose final point of delivery or sale is outside of Rhode Island;

Any sales of anesthesia or epidurals as defined in regulation by the department; and

Any in-state intracompany transfers of opioids between any division, affiliate, subsidiary, parent, or other entity under complete and common ownership and control.

The executive office shall provide to the licensee, in writing, on or before October 15 annually, the licensee’s market share for the previous calendar year. The executive office shall notify the licensee, in writing, on or before October 15 of each year, of its market share for the prior calendar year based on the opioids sold or distributed for the prior calendar year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

21-28.10-4.
Reports and records.

Each manufacturer, distributor, and wholesaler licensed to manufacture or distribute opioids in the state of Rhode Island shall provide to the secretary a report detailing all opioids sold or distributed by that manufacturer or distributor in the state of Rhode Island. Such report shall include:

The manufacturer’s, distributor’s, or wholesaler’s name, address, phone number, DEA registration number, and controlled substance license number issued by the department;

The name, address, and DEA registration number of the entity to whom the opioid was sold or distributed;

The date of the sale or distribution of the opioids;

The gross receipt total, in dollars, of all opioids sold or distributed;

The name and National Drug Code of the opioids sold or distributed;

The number of containers and the strength and metric quantity of controlled substance in each container of the opioids sold or distributed; and

Any other elements as deemed necessary or advisable by the secretary.

Initial and future reports. This information shall be reported annually to the executive office via ARCOS or in such other form as defined or approved by the secretary; provided, however, that the initial report provided pursuant to subsection (a) shall consist of all opioids sold or distributed in the state of Rhode Island for the 2018 calendar year, and shall be submitted by September 1, 2019. Subsequent annual reports shall be submitted by April 15 of each year based on the actual opioid sales and distributions of the prior calendar year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

21-28.10-5.
Payment of market share.

The licensee shall make payments annually to the executive office with the first payment of its market share due on December 31, 2019; provided, that the amount due on December 31, 2019, shall be for the full amount of the payment for the 2018 calendar year, with subsequent payments to be due and owing on the last day of every year thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

21-28.10-6.
Rebate of market share.

In any year for which the secretary determines that a licensee failed to report information required by this chapter, those licensees complying with this chapter shall receive a reduced assessment of their market share in the following year equal to the amount in excess of any overpayment in the prior payment period.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

21-28.10-7.
Licensee opportunity to appeal.

A licensee shall be afforded an opportunity to submit information to the secretary documenting or evidencing that the market share provided to the licensee (or amounts paid thereunder), pursuant to §

21-28.10-3(4)

, is in error or otherwise not warranted. The executive office may consider and examine such additional information that it determines to be reasonably related to resolving the calculation of a licensee’s market share, which may require the licensee to provide additional materials to the executive office. If the executive office determines thereafter that all or a portion of such market share, as determined by the secretary pursuant to §

21-28.10-3(4)

, is not warranted, the executive office may:

Adjust the market share;

Adjust the assessment of the market share in the following year equal to the amount in excess of any overpayment in the prior payment period; or

Refund amounts paid in error.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the executive office relating to the calculation of market share may appeal that decision to the superior court, which shall have power to review such decision, and the process by which such decision was made, as prescribed in chapter 35 of title 42.

A licensee shall also have the ability to appeal its assessed opioid registration fee if the assessed fee amount exceeds the amount of profit the licensee obtains through sales in the state of products described in §

21-28.10-3

. The executive office may, exercising discretion as it deems appropriate, waive or decrease fees as assessed pursuant to §

21-28.10-3

if a licensee can demonstrate that the correctly assessed payment will pose undue hardship to the licensee’s continued activities in state. The executive office shall be allowed to request, and the licensee shall furnish to the department, any information or supporting documentation validating the licensee’s request for waiver or reduction under this subsection. Fees waived under this section shall not be reapportioned to other licensees which have payments due under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

21-28.10-8.
Annual reporting.

By January of each calendar year, the department of health, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, the executive office, the department of children, youth and families, the Rhode Island department of education, the Rhode Island office of veterans services, the department of corrections, the department of labor and training, and any other department or agency receiving opioid stewardship funds shall report annually to the governor, the speaker of the house, and the senate president which programs in their respective departments were funded using monies from the opioid stewardship fund and the total amount of funds spent on each program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 2, § 2, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

21-28.10-9.
Penalties.

The executive office may assess a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day against any licensee that fails to comply with this chapter.

In addition to any other civil penalty provided by law, where a licensee has failed to pay its market share in accordance with §

21-28.10-5

, the executive office may also assess a penalty of no less than ten percent (10%) and no greater than three hundred percent (300%) of the market share due from such licensee.

In addition to any other criminal penalty provided by law, where a licensee has failed to pay its market share in accordance with §

21-28.10-5

, the executive office may also assess a penalty of no less than ten percent (10%) and no greater than fifty percent (50%) of the market share due from such licensee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

21-28.10-10.
Creation of opioid stewardship fund.

There is hereby established, in the custody of the executive office, a restricted-receipt account to be known as the “opioid stewardship fund.”

Monies in the opioid stewardship fund shall be kept separate and shall not be commingled with any other monies in the custody of the executive office.

The opioid stewardship fund shall consist of monies appropriated for the purpose of such account; monies transferred to such account pursuant to law; contributions consisting of promises or grants of any money or property of any kind or value, or any other thing of value, including grants or other financial assistance from any agency of government; and monies required by the provisions of this chapter or any other law to be paid into or credited to this account.

Monies of the opioid stewardship fund shall be available to provide opioid treatment, recovery, prevention, education services, and other related programs, subject to appropriation by the general assembly.

The budget officer is hereby authorized to create restricted receipt accounts entitled “opioid stewardship fund allocation” in any department or agency of state government wherein monies from the opioid stewardship fund are appropriated by the general assembly for the programmatic purposes set forth in subsection (d) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 2, § 2, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

21-28.10-11.
Allocation.

The monies, when allocated, shall be paid out of the opioid stewardship fund and subject to the approval of the secretary and the approvals of the directors of the departments of health and behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

21-28.10-12.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such invalid provisions had not been included herein.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17.

21-28.10-13.
Rules and regulations.

The secretary may prescribe rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter 28.10 of title 21, which rules and regulations, when reasonably designed to carry out the intent and purpose of this chapter, are prima facie evidence of its proper interpretation. Such rules and regulations may be amended, suspended, or revoked, from time to time and in whole or in part, by the secretary. The secretary may prescribe, and may furnish, any forms necessary or advisable for the administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 17; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 8, effective June 27, 2022.

21-28.10-14.
Transfer of powers and duties.

The employee responsible for performing fiscal functions associated with the management of the opioid stewardship fund within the department of health shall be transferred to the executive office.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 3, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.